test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_kaahus_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kááhuš: # MLO, ok
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Nom: kááhuš
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Gen: kahhuu
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Acc: kahhuu
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Ill: kahhuužân
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Loc: kahhuust
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Com: kahhuin
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Abe: kahhuuttáá
    kááhuš+N+Ess: kahhuužin
    kááhuš+N+Par: kahhuužid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Nom: kahhuuh
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Gen: kahhui
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Acc: kahhuid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Ill: kahhuid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Loc: kahhuin
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Com: kahhuiguin
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Abe: kahhuittáá
    
